Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1080
Class IV and V school districts; school tax; how payable.

All taxes collected for the benefit of the public schools in Class IV and V school districts shall be paid in money and shall be subject to the order of the board of education.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 23, p. 325;

R.S.1913, § 7029;

C.S.1922, § 6660;

C.S.1929, § 79-2723;

R.S.1943, § 79-2726;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 225, p. 765;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-538;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 726.